District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.72

DC Streetcar.

The Department shall have the power to:

(1)

Plan, develop, operate, control, and regulate the DC Streetcar, including establishing fares, charges, tickets, fines, and routes and schedules;

(2)

Sell space on and within DC Streetcar vehicles or other assets for the display of advertisements and enter into agreements with entities to sell space on vehicles or other assets in return for a fee, or as a gift or donation of services approved by the Mayor;

(3)

Enter into contracts with third parties for the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the DC Streetcar; and

(4)

Concurrent with any other agency’s authority to do so, enforce violations of this subchapter and regulations promulgated thereunder, with respect to fare payment.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11n
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6032(b), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6022, 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 50-921.73.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (3) and made related changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added the subdivision designated herein as (4) and made related changes.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6042(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6022 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.